Massachusetts, session 194th, H3787.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8A1/2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following:-
“Any individual without a CDL license may declare their intent to attain said license
solely for use in operating a school bus. Any such person shall be allowed to take the written
CDL examination without questions relating to maintenance and visual inspections of the
vehicle’s engine and other mechanical components. Any CDL license issued through this process
shall only apply to the operation of school buses, any person holding said license would have to
pass a full written examination without exemptions before operating other forms of commercial
vehicles. The entity maintaining ownership of the school bus shall be responsible for inspection
and maintenance of said vehicle to ensure its proper functioning.”
of 1